test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-voontsa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vȱntsa: # Noun 31 'eng /est otsmik/fin' - full paradigm
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Nom: vȱntsa
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Gen: vȱntsa
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Par: vȯntsõ
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Dat: vȱntsan
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Ins: vȱntsaks
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Ill: vȯntsõ
     vȱntsa+N+Sg+Ela: vȱntsast
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Nom: vȱntsad
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Gen: vȱntsad
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Par: vȯņtšti
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Dat: vȱntsadõn
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Ins: vȱntsadõks
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Ill: vȱntsiž
     vȱntsa+N+Pl+Ela: vȱntsist
